Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1009.
do enact as follows:AB1009,11Section 1. 66.1114 of the statutes is created to read:AB1009,2,2266.1114 Tourism promotion improvement districts. (1) In this section:AB1009,2,73(a) “Activities” includes the promotion of public events that generate 4increased paid overnight stays in a business, the promotion of tourism within a 5tourism promotion improvement district, marketing- and tourism-related economic 6development, and other services provided for the purpose of conferring specific 7benefits upon businesses located in a tourism promotion improvement district.AB1009,2,88(b) “Business” means a hotel or motel, as defined in s. 77.52 (2) (a) 1.AB1009,2,129(c) “Governing body” means a committee of persons identified by an owners’ 10association that consists solely of representatives of businesses within a tourism 11promotion improvement district and that is responsible for managing assessments 12collected from a tourism promotion improvement district under this section.AB1009,2,1413(d) “Hosting platform” means a marketplace provider, as defined in s. 77.51 14(7i).AB1009,3,315(e) “Improvements” means the acquisition, construction, installation, or 1maintenance of any tangible property or infrastructure with an estimated useful 2life of 5 or more years that is designed to increase room nights sold by or to 3otherwise benefit businesses within a tourism promotion improvement district.AB1009,3,54(f) “Local legislative body” means a common council, village board of trustees, 5town board of supervisors, or county board of supervisors.AB1009,3,66(g) “Owner” means the owner or authorized agent of a business.AB1009,3,107(h) “Owners’ association” means a private, nonprofit entity that is tasked with 8promoting tourism and that is responsible for completing the improvements and 9activities specified in the operating plan for a tourism promotion improvement 10district under sub. (2).AB1009,3,1111(i) “Political subdivision” means a city, village, town, or county.AB1009,3,1412(j) “Tourism promotion improvement district” or “district” means an area that 13is fully or partially within a political subdivision and that includes two or more 14businesses.AB1009,3,1615(2) A political subdivision may create a tourism promotion improvement 16district and adopt its operating plan if all of the following conditions are met:AB1009,4,217(a) The owners of at least 50 percent of the total number of hotel and motel 18rooms located in the proposed tourism promotion improvement district have 19petitioned the political subdivision to create a tourism promotion improvement 20district and developed a proposed initial operating plan for the district. The 21petition shall include a summary of the proposed initial operating plan that 22includes a map showing the boundaries of the proposed district and information on 23how to obtain a complete version of the proposed initial operating plan upon 1request. The complete version of the proposed initial operating plan shall include 2all of the following:AB1009,4,631. A map of the district in sufficient detail to locate each business within the 4district and a description of the boundaries of the district, including the boundaries 5of any benefit zones established under subd. 6., which may be made by reference to 6any plan or map that is on file with the political subdivision’s clerk.AB1009,4,872. The name of the district and the name of the owners’ association for the 8district.AB1009,4,1193. The improvements and activities that will be undertaken within the 10district for each year of its operation and the estimated cost of those improvements 11and activities.AB1009,4,13124. The estimated amount that will be expended for improvements and 13activities, and any debt service, within the district for each year of its operation.AB1009,4,15145. The sources of financing to pay for any improvements and activities, and 15any debt service, within the district, including whether bonds will be issued.AB1009,4,24166. The method and basis for levying assessments on businesses within the 17district, including any increases in assessment amounts, stated in sufficient detail 18to allow each owner to estimate the amount of the assessments that will be levied 19against the owner’s business. The operating plan may establish one or more classes 20of businesses within the district that will benefit from the improvements and 21activities described in the operating plan. The operating plan may also establish 22one or more benefit zones within the district if the businesses within the benefit 23zones will benefit in a similar manner from the improvements and activities 24described in the operating plan.AB1009,5,317. A statement as to whether a hosting platform will collect any assessments, 2and the amount of any fee that the hosting platform will charge for collecting 3assessments, which may not exceed 5 percent of the amount of the assessment paid.AB1009,5,648. A statement as to whether businesses are authorized to retain a portion of 5an assessment to cover administrative costs related to processing the assessment. 6The amount retained may not exceed 5 percent of the total assessment collected.AB1009,5,1179. The number of years for which assessments will be levied, which may not 8exceed 5 years for a new tourism promotion improvement district or 10 years for a 9renewed district, except that if a district is created for the purpose of financing 10capital improvements with bonds, assessments shall be levied for the maximum 11lifetime of those bonds.AB1009,5,121210. The governing body for the district.AB1009,5,141311. Any other requirements that will apply to businesses within the tourism 14promotion improvement district.AB1009,5,2315(b) At least 30 days before creation of the tourism promotion improvement 16district and adoption of its operating plan by the political subdivision, the local 17legislative body has held a public hearing on the proposed tourism promotion 18improvement district and its proposed initial operating plan. Notice of the hearing 19shall be published as a class 2 notice under ch. 985 and shall include information on 20how to obtain a complete version of the proposed initial operating plan upon 21request. Before publication, a copy of the notice, together with a summary of the 22proposed initial operating plan, shall be sent by mail to all owners within the 23proposed tourism promotion improvement district. AB1009,6,824(c) The local legislative body has voted to create the tourism promotion 1improvement district and to adopt, or to modify and adopt, the proposed operating 2plan. If the local legislative body modifies the proposed tourism promotion 3improvement district or its proposed operating plan, the local legislative body may 4only reduce proposed assessments, modify the boundaries of the proposed tourism 5promotion improvement district, or modify the improvements or activities in the 6proposed operating plan. If the local legislative body votes to create a tourism 7promotion improvement district, the local legislative body shall adopt a resolution 8that includes all of the following:AB1009,6,1491. A brief description of the improvements and activities that will be 10undertaken in the district, the amount of the assessments that will be levied on 11businesses within the district, a statement as to whether bonds will be issued, and 12a description of the exterior boundaries of the district, which may be made by 13reference to any plan or map that is on file with the clerk of the political 14subdivision.AB1009,6,15152. The time and place where the public hearing under par. (b) was held.AB1009,6,17163. A determination regarding any protests received concerning the creation of 17the district.AB1009,6,20184. A statement that the improvements and activities that will be undertaken 19in the district will be funded by the levy of the assessments on businesses within 20the district.AB1009,6,23215. A finding that the businesses within the district will benefit from the 22improvements and activities funded by the assessments levied on businesses within 23the district.AB1009,7,824(d) Within 30 days after the local legislative body has voted to create the 1tourism promotion improvement district under par. (c), the owners of at least 50 2percent of the total number of hotel and motel rooms located in the approved 3tourism promotion improvement district have not filed a petition with the political 4subdivision protesting the creation of the tourism promotion improvement district 5as approved by the political subdivision. If such a petition is filed, the political 6subdivision may not create a tourism promotion improvement district that includes 7the businesses identified in the petition for a period of one year after the petition is 8filed.AB1009,7,119(3) (a) A city, town, or village may create a tourism promotion improvement 10district within the unincorporated territory of a county only with the consent of the 11board of supervisors of that county. AB1009,7,1512(b) A city, town, or village may create a tourism promotion improvement 13district within the territorial jurisdiction of another city, town, or village only with 14the consent of the legislative body of the other city, board of supervisors of the other 15town, or board of trustees of the other village.AB1009,7,1816(c) A county may create a tourism promotion improvement district within the 17territorial jurisdiction of another county only with the consent of the board of 18supervisors of that county. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab1009 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab1009 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1009 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1009 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB1009: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting